Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 6. Special Harvest Area Entry Permits.

Sec. 16.43.400.
Special harvest area entry permits.

In addition to entry permits, interim-use permits, and educational permits, the commission may issue special harvest area entry permits to holders of private, nonprofit hatchery permits issued by the Department of Fish and Game under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.475

.

The commission may issue special harvest area entry permits notwithstanding the establishment of maximum or optimum numbers under AS

16.43.240

and

16.43.290

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.43.335

. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 16.43.410.
Term and conditions of special harvest area entry permits.

Special harvest area entry permits may be applied for on an annual basis and shall be issued for a term of one year. A permit is nontransferable.

A special harvest area entry permit may only be issued for the applicable area designated by the Department of Fish and Game as a special harvest area.

The annual fee for a special harvest area entry permit shall be specified by commission regulation under the authority of AS

16.43.160

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.337. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 16.43.420.
Disposition of fish.

Fish caught under the authority of a special harvest area entry permit are the property of the permit holder.
The permit holder may sell the fish if the proceeds are used in the manner described in AS

16.10.450

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.339. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 16.43.430.
Authorized gear.

For the purposes of harvesting salmon, a special harvest area entry permit holder may employ any fishing gear designated as legal gear in the applicable special harvest area by the Board of Fisheries.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.43.341

. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 16.43.440.
Adoption of regulations.

Use privileges granted under AS

16.43.400

—

16.43.440

are subject to the regulations of the Board of Fisheries.

The commission, after consultation with the Department of Fish and Game, shall adopt regulations that are reasonably necessary to implement AS

16.43.400

—

16.43.440

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.343. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.